California statutes. Education Code
A person or entity that reports directly to the system that is assessed a penalty or interest pursuant to Section 26301 or 26303 may appeal the assessed penalty or interest using the appeals process established pursuant to Section 22219.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 249, Sec. 11.   (AB 654)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

26303.7.

Penalties and interest due to the system pursuant to Section 26301 or 26303 are additional required contributions that, when received, shall be deposited to the Teachers’ Retirement Fund and treated in the same manner as other contributions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 275, Sec. 17.   (AB 2101)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26304.

An employer shall provide timely notice to the system of the employment, death, or termination of employment of a participant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 608, Sec. 17.   Effective September 19, 1996.   Applicable from July 1, 1996, pursuant to Sec. 58 of Ch. 608.)
-------------------------------------------

26305.

Upon request of the system, an employer shall provide the system with information regarding the salary paid or to be paid to employees subject to coverage by the Cash Balance Benefit Program in a plan year. The information may include, but shall not be limited to, employment contracts, salary schedules, and minutes from meetings conducted by the governing board of the employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 260.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26306.

(a) Upon request by the system, a participant or beneficiary with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program shall provide to the system any information affecting his or her status as a participant or beneficiary.

(b) Upon request by the system, the participant shall provide proof of his or her date of birth.

(c) A participant who has not contributed to the Cash Balance Benefit Program during the immediately preceding plan year shall provide the system with his or her current mailing address and beneficiary information.

(d) For a trust as defined in
 subdivision (b) of Section 26106.5 that is designated as a joint and survivor annuity beneficiary, the following documentation is required: 

(1) The participant shall provide an acknowledged certification that includes each declaration prescribed by clause A-6 of Section 1.401(a)(9)-4 of Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations and a declaration that the trust meets the requirements and conditions as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 26106.5. The certification shall be submitted to the system at the time of election of the beneficiary and is required for the election to be valid. The certification shall be in the form of an acknowledged declaration signed by the participant and by all then-acting trustees of the trust.

(2) After the participant’s death, the then-acting trustee or trustees of the trust shall provide an acknowledged certification that includes each of the
 declarations prescribed by clause A-6 of Section 1.401(a)(9)-4 of Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations and a declaration that the trust meets the requirements and conditions as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 26106.5. The certification by the trustee or trustees of the trust shall be submitted to the system upon the participant’s death and shall additionally certify that the trust has not been revoked, modified, or amended in any manner which would cause the representations contained in the certification to be incorrect. The certification shall contain a statement that it is being signed by all of the then-acting trustees of the trust and shall be in the form of an acknowledged declaration signed by all the then-acting trustees.

(3) At any time, upon demand by the system, the participant or trustee of the trust shall provide a copy of the trust instrument.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 559, Sec. 14.   (AB 1875)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Eligibility [26400. - 26403.]

26400.

(a) (1) Any person who is not already a member of the Defined Benefit Program and who is employed to perform creditable service by an employer that provides the Cash Balance Benefit Program shall become a participant in the Cash Balance Benefit Program for creditable service performed for that employer if the person is not excluded from participation pursuant to Section 22601 and all employment to perform creditable service for that employer meets either of the following conditions:

(A) The person is employed by an employer, excluding a community college district, to perform creditable service on a part-time basis for less than 50 percent of the
 time the employer requires for the full-time position, or on a substitute, part-time hourly or part-time daily basis.

(B) The person is employed by a community college district to perform creditable service on a temporary basis pursuant to Section 87474, 87478, 87480, 87481, 87482, or 87482.5.

(2) Participation shall begin as of the first day of employment or the effective date of the employer’s governing board’s action to provide the Cash Balance Benefit Program, whichever is later.

(b) If the employer’s governing board’s action to provide the Cash Balance Benefit Program gives employees the right to elect coverage by the federal Social Security Act or an alternative retirement plan offered by the employer in addition to
 the Cash Balance Benefit Program, the employee may elect coverage by the federal Social Security Act or the alternative retirement plan in lieu of participating in the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(1) The election shall be made in writing on a properly executed form prescribed by the system and filed with the employer within 60 calendar days after the first day of employment, or the date of the employer’s governing board’s action to provide the Cash Balance Benefit Program, or the effective date of the employer’s governing board’s action to provide the Cash
 Balance Benefit Program, whichever occurs later.

(2) The election form shall be received at the system’s headquarters office within 60 calendar days after the date of the employee’s signature. The employer shall retain a copy of the signed election form.

(3) The election shall become effective as of the first day of employment or the effective date of the employer’s governing board’s action to provide the Cash Balance Benefit Program, whichever occurs later.

(c) If the employer’s governing board subsequently provides coverage by the federal Social
 Security Act, a person who becomes a participant in the Cash Balance Benefit Program pursuant to subdivision (a) may elect coverage by the federal Social Security Act in lieu of participating in the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(1) The election shall be made in writing on a properly executed form prescribed by the system and filed with the employer within 60 calendar days after the date of the employer’s governing board’s action to provide coverage by the federal Social Security Act or the effective date of the employer’s governing board’s action to provide coverage by the federal Social Security Act, whichever occurs later.

(2) The election form shall be received by the system’s headquarters office within 60 calendar days after the date of the employee’s signature. The employer shall retain a copy of the signed election form.

(3) The election shall become effective as of the effective date of the employer’s governing board’s action to provide coverage by the federal Social Security Act.

(d) If the governing board of an employer provided federal Social Security Act coverage with an effective date prior to January 1, 2007, and the employer offered the Cash Balance Benefit Program as of the effective date of the governing board’s action to provide federal Social Security Act coverage, a participant who was performing creditable service for
 that employer may elect to be covered by the federal Social Security Act in lieu of the Cash Balance Benefit Program. The participant’s election shall be made on or after March 1, 2008, and on or before May 1, 2008. The election to participate in the federal Social Security Act shall be effective on July 1, 2008.

(e) An election made pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (d) shall not preclude an employee from electing to participate in the Cash Balance Benefit Program for creditable service performed for that employer at a later date if the employer still provides the Cash Balance Benefit Program and the employee is eligible for participation as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(1) The election shall be made in writing on a properly executed form prescribed by the
 system and filed with the employer.

(2) The election form shall be received by the system’s headquarters office within 60 calendar days after the date of the employee’s signature and prior to the submission of contributions. The employer shall retain a copy of the signed election form.

(3) The election shall be effective no earlier than the first day of the pay period in which the election is made and may not be canceled.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 318, Sec. 9.   (AB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

26401.

(a) (1) A member of the Defined Benefit Program who is employed by an employer that provides the Cash Balance Benefit Program may elect to become a participant of the Cash Balance Benefit Program for creditable service performed for that employer if all employment to perform creditable service for that employer meets either of the following conditions:

(A) The member is employed by an employer, excluding a community college district, to perform creditable service on a part-time basis for less than 50 percent of the time the employer requires for the full-time position or on a substitute, part-time hourly, or part-time daily basis.

(B) The member is employed by a community college district to perform creditable service on a temporary basis pursuant to Section 87474, 87478, 87480, 87481, 87482, or 87482.5.

(2) The election shall be made in writing on a properly executed form prescribed by the system and filed with the employer within 60 calendar days after the first day of employment, or the date of the employer’s governing board’s action to provide the Cash Balance Benefit Program, or the effective date of the employer’s governing board’s action to provide the Cash Balance Benefit Program, whichever occurs later.

(3) The election form shall be received at
 the system’s headquarters office within 60 calendar days after the date of the employee’s signature and prior to the submission of contributions. The employer shall retain a copy of the signed election form.

(4) The election shall become effective as of the first day of employment or the effective date of the employer’s governing board’s action to provide the Cash Balance Benefit Program, whichever occurs later.

(b) (1) If an employee was excluded from participation in the Cash Balance Benefit Program pursuant to Section 26401.5, as that section read on December 31, 2000, for the same
 service, the employee may elect to become a participant for creditable service subject to coverage under the Cash Balance Benefit Program for that employer, provided all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The employment is pursuant to Section 87474, 87478, 87480, 87481, 87482, or 87482.5.

(B) The employer offers the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(C) The creditable service is not also subject to mandatory membership in the Defined Benefit Program.

(2) Employers shall, on or before May 1, 2007, make available to employees described in this subdivision, information and forms provided by the system for making an election regarding participation. The employee
 shall submit the form to the employer within a 60-day election period designated by the employer. The employer shall retain a copy of the employee’s signed election form and mail the original signed election form to the system’s headquarters office. The election shall become effective on the first day of the pay period following the pay period in which the election is made.

(c) A member who elects to participate in the Cash Balance Benefit Program pursuant to this section may subsequently elect that creditable service performed for the employer be subject to coverage by the Defined Benefit Program in lieu of the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(1) The election shall be made in writing on a properly executed form prescribed by the system and filed with the employer at any time
 while employed to perform creditable service.

(2) The election form shall be received at the system’s headquarters office within 60 calendar days after the date of the employee’s signature and prior to the submission of contributions. The employer shall retain a copy of the signed election form.

(3) The election shall become effective no earlier than the first day of the pay period in which the election is made and is irrevocable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 318, Sec. 10.   (AB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

26403.

(a) A person who performs trustee service for an employer who has elected to provide benefits pursuant to this part to its employees may elect to participate in the Cash Balance Benefit Program for that service.

(1) The election shall be made in writing on a properly executed form prescribed by the system and filed with the employer at any time while performing trustee service.

(2) The election form shall be received at the system’s headquarters office within 60 calendar days after the date of the trustee’s signature and prior to the submission of contributions. The employer shall retain a
 copy of the election form.

(3) The election shall become effective no earlier than the first day of the pay period in which the election is made.

(b) An election made pursuant to this section is irrevocable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 318, Sec. 11.   (AB 1452)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Contributions [26500. - 26507.]

26500.

Acceptance of employment subject to coverage by the Cash Balance Benefit Program constitutes consent to have contributions deducted from the employee’s salary as required by Section 26501.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 264.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26501.

Except as provided in Section 26504, the participant shall contribute an amount equivalent to 4 percent of salary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26501.5.

A person who elects, pursuant to Section 26403, to participate in the Cash Balance Benefit Program shall make contributions, as provided in Section 26501, based on his or her salary or other compensation earned for trustee service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1020, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

26502.

Notwithstanding Section 26301.5, the employer may pick up, for the sole purpose of and in accordance with the requirements of Section 414(h)(2) of Title 26 of the United States Code and Section 17501 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, all of the amounts otherwise due as employee contributions, which shall be paid by the employer in lieu of employee contributions and which shall be deducted from the employee’s salary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 265.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26503.

Except as provided in Sections 26504 and 26507, the employer shall contribute an amount equivalent to 4 percent of salary for each participant employed by the employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26503.5.

If a person elects, pursuant to Section 26403, to participate in the Cash Balance Benefit Program, his or her employer shall make contributions, as provided in Section 26503, based on the salary or other compensation paid for trustee service. For a participant subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013, other compensation paid for trustee service is subject to the same requirements as “salary” as defined in Section 26139.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 559, Sec. 38.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Deemed operative January 1, 2013, by Sec. 1 of Ch. 559.)
-------------------------------------------

26504.

The employer may enter into a collective bargaining agreement to pay a different employer contribution rate and a different employee contribution rate, provided all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The sum of the employee contributions and employer contributions for each participant shall equal or exceed 8 percent of salary.

(b) The employee contribution rate may exceed the employer contribution rate but in no event shall the employer contribution rate be less than 4 percent.

(c) The employee contribution rate shall not be less than the employer contribution rate. If
 the terms of a collective bargaining agreement that is in effect on January 1, 2014, would be impaired by this subdivision, this subdivision shall not apply to the employer and participants subject to that contract until the expiration of that contract. A renewal, amendment, or any other extension of that contract shall be subject to the requirements of this subdivision.

(d) The employee contribution rate and employer contribution rate shall be the same for each participant employed by the employer.

(e) The employee contribution rate and employer contribution rate shall be in one-quarter percent increments.

(f) The employee contribution rate and employer contribution rate as determined under the collective bargaining agreement shall become effective on the first day of the plan year following notification to the
 system and shall remain in effect for at least one plan year. However, the employee contribution rate and the employer contribution rate as determined under the collective bargaining agreement may become effective as of the first day of the plan year in which notice is given if it is so provided in the collective bargaining agreement and if a lump-sum contribution is made to the plan equal to the additional employee and employer contributions, if any, that would have been required if the contribution rates had been in effect on the first day of the plan year. Interest shall be credited at the minimum interest rate with respect to the lump-sum contribution commencing with the first month after the contribution is made.

(g) The employer has filed notice of the employee contribution rate and the employer contribution rate on a form prescribed by the system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 559, Sec. 39.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Deemed operative January 1, 2013, by Sec. 1 of Ch. 559.)
-------------------------------------------

26506.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), participants shall not make voluntary pretax or post-tax contributions into the Cash Balance Benefit Program, nor shall participants redeposit amounts previously distributed from employee accounts or employer accounts.

(b) Pursuant to terms and conditions established by the board, participants may be permitted to transfer funds from eligible retirement plans into the Cash Balance Benefit Program to the extent that the transfers are allowable under and are completed in a manner prescribed by applicable federal and state laws, and any related regulations.

(c) Funds deposited with the Cash Balance Benefit Program by a
 participant pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be credited to the participant and identified separately from credits in the participant’s employee and employer accounts. Funds so deposited shall be treated as credits to the participant’s employee account for all other purposes under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 123, Sec. 34.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

26507.

(a) The board may adjust the mandatory employer contribution rate specified under Section 26503 for a fixed period of plan years when it has determined based upon the recommendation of the actuary, that increased contributions are required. The adjustment shall not exceed one-fourth of one percent for any plan year. The mandatory employer contribution rate as adjusted shall not exceed 4.25 percent of salary in any plan year for each participant employed by the employer, except as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) The adjustment to the employer contribution rate specified in subdivision (a) shall be applied to the employer contribution rate specified in a collective bargaining agreement pursuant to Section 26504 and in effect on the first day of the plan year in which the adjustment to the employer contribution rate takes effect. 

(c) The adjusted employer contribution rate shall become effective no earlier than the first day of the plan year immediately following adoption by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 268.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Employee and Employer Accounts [26600. - 26607.]

26600.

All contributions based on salary earned by a participant, together with amounts credited under the minimum interest rate and additional earnings credit amounts, shall be treated as credits to individual accounts in the name of the participant. These accounts shall be nominal accounts used to determine the amount of retirement benefit, disability benefit, death benefit, or termination benefit of the participant or beneficiary. The participant shall have no actual individual account and shall have no claim to any particular assets of the plan or the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

26601.

All employee contributions and interest credited under the minimum interest rate and additional earnings credits in respect of those contributions shall be treated as credits to the participant’s employee account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

26602.

All employer contributions on behalf of the participant and interest credited under the minimum interest rate and additional earnings credits in respect of those contributions shall be treated as credits to the participant’s employer account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

26603.

(a) All employee contributions shall be credited to employee accounts and all employer contributions shall be credited to employer accounts effective as of the day contributions are required to be transmitted to the plan pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 26303.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 41) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 42.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

26604.

(a) Beginning June 1, 1996, prior to the Cash Balance Plan becoming effective, and prior to the beginning of each plan year thereafter, the board, by plan amendment with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program, shall declare the minimum interest rate for crediting employee accounts and employer accounts with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program during the following plan year.

(b) All interest shall be computed at the minimum interest rate on the balance of the employee account and the employer account and shall be compounded daily.

(c) Interest shall not be credited to employee accounts and employer accounts
 that have been transferred to the Annuitant Reserve for payment of an annuity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 218, Sec. 43.   (SB 1352)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

26605.

In the event that the total amount of investment earnings of the plan for any plan year exceeds the sum of the total amount required to credit all employee and employer accounts at the minimum interest rate for the plan year plus the administrative costs of the plan for the plan year, then following the determination by the board with respect to additions to the Gain and Loss Reserve described in subdivision (c) of Section 26202 the board may declare by means of plan amendment an additional earnings credit for the plan year with respect to the employee and employer accounts of the plan participants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

26606.

Any additional earnings credit declared shall be determined as a specified percentage increase in the closing balance of each employee account and employer account with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program measured as of the last day of the plan year. The additional earnings credit shall be credited to employee account and employer account balances as of the date the board declares the additional earnings credit is to be applied. The additional earnings credit shall not be credited to employee accounts and employer accounts that have been transferred to the Annuitant Reserve for payment of an annuity under the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 270.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26607.

(a) The board may declare by means of plan amendment with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program an additional annuity credit applicable to annuities being paid under the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(b) The declaration authorized by subdivision (a) may be made only when the board by plan amendment with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program declares an additional earnings credit as provided in Section 26605 and if the total amount of investment earnings of the plan with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program for the plan year exceeds the sum of the total amount required to credit all employee and employer accounts at the minimum interest rate, the administrative costs of the plan with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program for the plan year, any addition to be made to the Gain and Loss Reserve under subdivision (c) of Section 26202, the total amount required to credit all employee and employer accounts in respect of the additional earnings credit so declared, and any other obligations incurred by the plan with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(c) Any additional annuity credit with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program shall be based upon the annuity of the participant or beneficiary for the plan year and shall be paid as a lump sum to the participant or beneficiary on the date specified by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 271.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Rights to Benefits [26700. - 26704.]

26700.

A participant has a vested right to a retirement benefit equal in amount to the total balance of credits in his or her employee account and employer account. The right accrues when a person becomes a participant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 592, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

26701.

The right of a participant to a benefit under this part, whether by lump sum or annuity, is not subject to execution or any other process whatsoever, except to the extent permitted by Section 704.110 of the Code of Civil Procedure, and is unassignable except as specifically provided under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26702.

(a) For the purpose of payments into or out of the fund for adjustments of errors or omissions with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program, the period of limitation shall be applied as follows:

(1) No action may be commenced by or against the board, the system, or the plan more than three years after all obligations to or on behalf of the participant or beneficiary have been discharged.

(2) In cases where the system makes an error resulting in incorrect payment to the participant or beneficiary, the system’s right to commence recovery shall expire three years from the date of payment.

(3) If an erroneous payment is made due to lack of information or inaccurate information regarding eligibility of a participant or beneficiary to receive a benefit from the Cash Balance Benefit Program, the period of limitation shall commence when the system discovers the erroneous payment.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, if any erroneous payment has been made on the basis of fraud or intentional misrepresentation by a participant or beneficiary, or other party in relation to or on behalf of a participant or beneficiary, the three-year period of limitation shall not be deemed to commence or to have commenced until the system discovers the erroneous payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1048, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26703.

The signature of the spouse of a participant shall be required on a designation of beneficiary form, an election, change, or termination of an annuity, or an application for a retirement benefit, disability benefit, or termination benefit under this part, unless the participant declares in writing, under penalty of perjury, that one of the following conditions exists:

(a) The participant is not married.

(b) The participant does not know, and has taken all reasonable steps to determine, the whereabouts of the spouse.

(c) The spouse is incapable of
 executing the acknowledgment because of an incapacitating mental or physical condition.

(d) The participant and spouse have executed a marriage settlement agreement pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 4 of the Family Code that makes the community property law inapplicable to the marriage.

(e) The current spouse has no identifiable community property interest in the benefit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 75.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

26704.

If a spouse refuses to sign a beneficiary designation, an election, change, or termination of an annuity, or an application for a retirement benefit, disability benefit, or termination benefit payable under this part, the participant may bring an action in court to enforce the spousal signature requirement or to waive the spousal signature requirement. Either party may bring an action pursuant to Section 1101 of the Family Code to determine the rights of the party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 755, Sec. 76.   (SB 1220)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Retirement Benefit [26800. - 26813.]

26800.

The normal retirement age for the Cash Balance Benefit Program is 60 years of age, or 62 years of age for a participant subject to the California Public Employees’ Pension Reform Act of 2013.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 559, Sec. 40.   (AB 1381)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Deemed operative January 1, 2013, by Sec. 1 of Ch. 559.)
-------------------------------------------

26801.

Except as provided under Section 26802, a participant’s retirement date shall not be earlier than either the date on which the participant attains 55 years of age or the first day of the month in which an application is received at the system’s headquarters office, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 275, Sec. 18.   (AB 2101)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

26802.

Distribution of the retirement benefit under this part shall commence no later than the required beginning date specified in subdivision (c) of Section 26004.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 273.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26803.

(a) All creditable service subject to coverage by the Cash Balance Benefit Program and the Defined Benefit Program, which does not include retired member activities as defined in Section 22164.5 or retired participant activities as defined in Section 26135.7, shall be terminated prior to the retirement date.

(b) All employers with which the participant is employed to perform creditable service subject to coverage by the plan shall certify in a format prescribed by the system that the participant’s employment has been terminated unless the employment was terminated 12 months or more prior to the participant’s retirement date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 231, Sec. 3.   (AB 1824)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

26804.

Application for a retirement benefit under this part shall be made on a form prescribed by the system. A participant who files an application for a retirement benefit may change or cancel the retirement application if all of the following are met:

(a) The form provided by the system is received in the system’s headquarters office no later than 30 days from the date of the participant’s initial benefit payment.

(b) The participant returns the total gross distribution amount of all payments for any canceled retirement benefit, including a lump-sum payment being changed to an annuity, to the system’s headquarters office no later than 45 days from the date of the participant’s initial benefit payment. The participant shall be
 liable for any adverse tax consequences that may result from these actions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 186, Sec. 5.   (SB 634)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

26805.

The retirement benefit under this part is a benefit payable in the event of retirement that is an amount equal to the sum of the employee account and the employer account as of the retirement date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 965, Sec. 276.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

26806.

(a) The normal form of retirement benefit under this part is a lump-sum payment. Upon distribution of the lump-sum payment to the participant, no further benefits shall be payable from the plan with respect to the Cash Balance Benefit Program.

(b) The lump-sum payment in subdivision (a) shall not be payable before 180 calendar days have elapsed following the date of termination of employment.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d) or subdivision (e) of Section 26812, the application for the retirement benefit in the form of a lump-sum payment shall be automatically canceled if the participant performs creditable service within 180 calendar days following the
 date of termination of employment.

(d) Subdivision (c) does not apply if the participant has reached that age at which the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 requires a distribution of benefits. A participant who has reached this age shall receive a distribution commencing on the earlier of the date that the participant has met the conditions of subdivision (b) or the conditions of subdivision (c) of Section 26004.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 123, Sec. 35.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

26807.

(a) Upon application for a retirement benefit under this part, the participant may elect to receive the retirement benefit in the form of an annuity, provided the sum of the employee account and employer account equals or exceeds three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500).

(b) If the participant elects to receive the retirement benefit as an annuity, the participant shall elect one of the following forms of payment:

(1) A single life annuity without a cash refund feature. This form of payment is the actuarial equivalent of the amount that would be payable to the participant if the
 participant elected to receive the retirement benefit in a lump-sum payment. This benefit shall be payable for the life of the participant. Upon the death of the participant, no other benefit shall be payable to any beneficiary under this part.

(2) A single life annuity with a cash refund feature. This form of payment is the actuarial equivalent of the amount that would be payable to the participant if the participant elected to receive the retirement benefit in a lump-sum payment. This benefit shall be payable for the life of the participant and any balance remaining upon the death of the participant shall be payable in a lump sum to the participant’s beneficiary.

(3) A 100-percent joint and survivor annuity with a “pop-up” feature. This form of payment is the actuarial equivalent
 of the amount that would be payable to the participant if the participant elected to receive the retirement benefit in a lump-sum payment, modified to be payable over the combined lives of the participant and the participant’s annuity beneficiary. Upon the death of the participant, the monthly amount that was payable to the participant shall be paid monthly to the participant’s annuity beneficiary. However, if the annuity beneficiary predeceases the participant, the annuity payable to the participant shall be the single life annuity with a cash refund feature that would have been payable had the participant elected that form of payment at the commencement of the benefit. That single life annuity shall be payable as of the day following the date of the annuity beneficiary’s death upon receipt by the system of proof of the annuity beneficiary’s death. If the annuity beneficiary predeceases the
 participant, the participant may designate a new annuity beneficiary. The effective date of the new designation shall be six months following the date notification, on a properly executed form, is received by the board, provided both the participant and the new designated annuity
 beneficiary are then living. The designation of the new annuity beneficiary under this paragraph shall be subject to an actuarial modification of the single life annuity with a cash refund feature and shall not result in any additional liability to the fund. The new annuity beneficiary shall not be an existing annuity beneficiary.

(4) A 50-percent joint and survivor annuity with a “pop-up” feature. This form of payment is the actuarial equivalent of the amount that would be payable to the participant if the participant elected to receive the retirement benefit in a lump-sum payment, modified to be payable over the combined lives of the participant and the participant’s annuity beneficiary. Upon the death of the participant, one-half of the monthly amount that was payable to the participant shall be paid monthly to the participant’s